fr: Transparence de la toile plastique: Opaque; Translucide; Transparent/clair; Autre
fi: Muovikankaan läpinäkyvyys: Läpinäkymätön; Puoliläpinäkyvä; Läpinäkyvä/kirkas; Muu
zh-TW: 塑膠畫布透明度: 不透明; 半透明; 透明; 其他
en: Plastic canvas transparency: Opaque; Translucent; Transparent/clear; Other
ru: Прозрачность пластиковой канвы: Непрозрачная; Полупрозрачная; Прозрачная; Другое
de: Transparenz des Kunststoff-Canvas: Blickdicht; Lichtdurchlässig; Transparent/Klar; Sonstige
lt-LT: Plastikinės kanvos skaidrumas: Nepermatomas; Pusiau skaidrus; Skaidrus; Kita
nb: Gjennomsiktighet av plastlerret: Ugjennomsiktig; Gjennomskinnelig; Gjennomsiktig/klar; Annet
da: Plastlærreds gennemsigtighed: Uigennemsigtig; Gennemskinnelig; Gennemsigtig/klar; Andet
zh-CN: 塑料画布透明度: 不透明; 半透明; 透明/清澈; 其他
vi: Vải nhựa trong suốt: Mờ đục; Trong mờ; Trong suốt; Khác
sk-SK: Priehľadnosť plastového plátna: Nepriehľadná; Priesvitná; Priehľadná/číra; Iné
pl: Przezierność kanwy plastikowej: Kryjąca; Półprzezroczysta; Przezroczysta/jasna; Inna
cs: Průhlednost plastového plátna: Neprůhledná; Průsvitná; Průhledná/čirá; Jiné
hr-HR: Prozirnost plastičnog platna: Neprozirno; Poluprozirno; Prozirno; Ostalo
sv: Genomskinlighet för plastduk: Opak; Translucent; Genomskinlig/klar; Övrigt
tr: Plastik kanvas şeffaflığı: Opak; Yarı saydam; Saydam/şeffaf; Diğer
sl-SI: Prosojnost plastičnega platna: Neprozorno; Prosojno; Prozorno; Drugo
pt-BR: Tela plástica transparência: Opaco; Translúcido; Transparente/incolor; Outro
ro-RO: Transparență pânză plastică: Opac; Translucid; Transparent/clar; Altele
pt-PT: Transparência da tela plástica: Opaca; Translúcida; Transparente/incolor; Outra
nl: Plastic canvas transparantie: Ondoorzichtig; Doorschijnend; Transparant/helder; Overig
es: Transparencia de la malla plástica: Opaco; Translúcido; Transparente/claro; Otro
ko: 플라스틱 캔버스 투명도: 불투명; 반투명; 투명; 기타
el: Διαφάνεια πλαστικού καμβά: Αδιαφανές; Ημιδιαφανές; Διαφανές/καθαρό; Άλλο
hu: Plastic canvas átlátszósága: Átlátszatlan; Áttetsző; Átlátszó; Egyéb
bg-BG: Прозрачност на пластмасовото платно: Непрозрачно; Полупрозрачно; Прозрачно/изчистено; Друго
ja: プラスチックキャンバスの透明性: 不透明; 半透明; 透明/クリア; その他
it: Trasparenza della tela plastica: Opaco; Traslucido; Trasparente/chiaro; Altro
th: แผ่นพลาสติกใสสำหรับผ้าใบ: ทึบแสง; โปร่งแสง; โปร่งใส/ใส; อื่นๆ